California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(e) This section shall only apply to electronic payments of fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 164.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

46156.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 46154, 46154.1, 46160, 46251, and 46356.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement, under penalty of perjury, setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the
 department may grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 82.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

46157.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 46153, 46154, 46160, and 46253.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area
 identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 83.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

46157.5.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay fees is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the
 feepayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on fee liabilities that arise during fee periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

46158.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the fees imposed or administered under this part and any penalty or interest added thereto. 

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied: 

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to the fee under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request. 

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to the fee, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to the fee. 

(3) The liability for fees applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following: 

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the
 rescinded or modified advice. 

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid. 

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice. 

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based. 

(3) Any other information which the board may require. 

(d) Only the person making the written request shall
 be entitled to rely on the board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46159.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A fee liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of the fee liability is
 attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the fee reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported fee liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in fee attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for the fee (including
 interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of the fee.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar months subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar month that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know”
 means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as an operator of a marine terminal, a pipeline, or a refinery engaged in activities subject to fees under this part to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as an operator, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances,
 it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid fee or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [46160. - 46163.]

46160.

(a) Any person whose estimated fee liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated fee liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 46151). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting fees by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person
 who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of fees with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit fees pursuant to this article who remits those fees by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fees incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any fee to the state or any amount of fee required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 46201) or Article 3, (commencing with Section 46251), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fee or amount of fee, in addition to the fee or amount of fee, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from
 the date on which the fee or the amount of fee required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated fee liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the fees due for any one return. Any person remitting fees by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 46154.

(i) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing
 this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 19.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

46161.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 46160. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

46162.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of the fee. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person
 through his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 46160 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

46163.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original
 document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [46201. - 46205.]

46201.

(a) If the board is dissatisfied with the return filed or the amount of fee paid to the state by any feepayer, the board may compute and determine the amount to be paid, based upon any information available to it. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount of fee due for one or for more than one period. When a business is discontinued, a determination may be made at any time thereafter, within the period specified in Section 46204, as to liability arising out of that business, irrespective of whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise
 specified in this part. In making a determination, the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods against underpayments for another period or periods and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments. 

(b) The amount of fee so determined shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount of the fee, or any portion thereof, became due and payable until the date of payment. 

(c) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is made is found to have been occasioned by negligence or intentional disregard of this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (b). 

(d) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is made is found to be occasioned by fraud or an intent to evade this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46202.

The department shall give to the feepayer written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the feepayer at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in a United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served.
 Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The feepayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the feepayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed
 complete at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the feepayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 96.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46203.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or failure to make a return, every notice of deficiency determination shall be served within three years after the 25th day of the month following the period for which the return was due or within three years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later. In the case of failure to make a return, the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the date the return was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 97.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46204.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the fee or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 98.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46205.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 46203 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the feepayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after that time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 99.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determinations If No Return Made [46251. - 46255.]

46251.

If any feepayer fails to make a return, the board shall make an estimate of the amount of fee to be paid. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information which is in the board’s possession or may come into its possession. Upon the basis of this estimate, the board shall compute and determine the amount of fee or other amount required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or more than one period. When a business is
 discontinued, a determination may be made at any time thereafter, within the periods specified in Section 46203, as to liability arising out of that business, irrespective of whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise specified in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46252.

In making a determination, the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46253.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from date the amount of the fee, or any portion thereof, became due and payable until the date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46254.

If the failure of any person to file a return is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the 10 percent penalty provided in Section 46251.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46255.

Promptly after making its determination, the department shall give to the person written notice of the estimate, determination, and penalty, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 100.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations [46301. - 46303.]

46301.

If the board believes that the collection of any amount of fee will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of fee due, noting that fact upon the determination, and the amount of fee shall be immediately due and payable. If the amount of the fee, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid, or a petition for redetermination is not filed, within 10 days after the service upon the taxpayer of notice of the determination, the determination becomes final, and the delinquency penalty and
 interest provided in Section 46154 shall attach to the amount of fee specified therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 527, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

46302.

The feepayer against whom a jeopardy determination is made may file a petition for the redetermination thereof, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 46351), with the department within 10 days after the service upon the feepayer of notice of the determination, but they shall, within the 10-day period, deposit with the department such security as it determines to be necessary to ensure compliance with this part. The security may be sold by the department at public sale if it becomes necessary in order to recover any amount due under this part. Notice of the sale may be served upon the person who deposited the security in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by Section 46202. Upon any such sale, the surplus, if any, above the amount due under this part shall be returned to the person who
 deposited the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 101.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46303.

(a) In accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes: 

(1) To establish that the determination is excessive. 

(2) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination, or any part thereof, shall be delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would
 result in irreparable injury to the person. 

(3) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person.

(4) To request a stay of collection activities. 

(b) The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. The person shall not be required to post any security in order to file the application and to obtain the hearing. However, if the person does not deposit, within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 46302, such security as the board may determine to be necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except the sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy
 determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely application for administrative hearing, the board may allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect the provisions of Section 46301 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [46351. - 46357.]

46351.

Any person from whom an amount is determined to be due under Article 2 (commencing with Section 46201) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 46251), or any person directly interested, may petition for a redetermination thereof within 30 days after service upon him or her of notice of the determination. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the amount determined to be due becomes final at the expiration thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46352.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46353.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the amount determined to be due, and, if the person has so requested in his or her petition, the board shall grant him or her an oral hearing and shall give him or her 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46354.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by subdivision (d) of Section 46201 or Section 46254 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase shall be asserted within eight years after the date the amount of fee for the period for which the increase is asserted was due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46355.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination shall become final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46356.

All amounts determined to be due by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 46201) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 46251) are due and payable at the time they become final, and, if not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount determined to be due shall be added to the amount due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46357.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by Section 46202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 102.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection of Fee [46401. - 46467.]



  ARTICLE 1. Security for Fee [46401. - 46407.]

46401.

(a) The board, whenever it determines it to be necessary to ensure compliance with this part, may require any person subject to this part to place with it such security as the board may determine to be reasonable, taking into account the circumstances of that person. Any security in the form of cash, government bonds, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions shall be held by the board in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section. The board may sell the security at public auction if it becomes necessary to do so in order to recover any fee or any amount required to
 be collected, including any interest or penalty due. Notice of the sale shall be served upon the person who placed the security personally or by mail.

(b) If service is made by mail, service shall be addressed to the person at his or her address as it appears in the records of the board. Service shall be made at least 30 days prior to the sale in the case of personal service, and at least 40 days prior to the sale in the case of service by mail. Security in the form of a bearer bond issued by the United States or the State of California which has a prevailing market price may, however, be sold by the board at private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price thereof. Upon any sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46402.

If any feepayer is delinquent in the payment of any obligations imposed by this part, or in the event a determination has been made against the feepayer which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment becomes delinquent, or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof, personally or by first-class mail, to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging
 to the feepayer, or owing any debts to the feepayer. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the notice shall be given to the officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46403.

After receiving the notice, the person so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46404.

All persons so notified shall immediately, after receipt of the notice, advise the board of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice, to be effective, shall state the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank at which the deposit is carried at which the credits or personal property is held.
 Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46405.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, he or she shall be liable to the state for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given, if solely by reason of that transfer or disposition, the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46406.

(a) The department may, by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a feepayer or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from those credits or other personal property the amount of any fee, interest, or penalties due from that feepayer or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as
 provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the feepayer or other
 person liable for the fee.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the feepayer or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the feepayer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by electronic transmission or other electronic technology to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.
